Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB182.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4906(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4906. False reports to law enforcement authorities.* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(3) If the violation of subsection (a) or (b) is based solely on the race or ethnicity of the alleged perpetrator of the crime or other incident within and not on actual suspicion that a crime has been or might be committed, the offense shall be graded as a misdemeanor of the first degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718